Maine, session 132, LD844.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
SOCIAL MEDIA SAFETY FOR MINORS
§1500-Z. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Account holder. "Account holder" means a person who has an account or profile
to use a social media company's social media platform.
2. Minor. "Minor" has the same meaning as in Title 18-C, section 5-102, subsection
18.
3. Parent. "Parent" has the same meaning as in Title 19-A, section 101, subsection 8.
4. Post. "Post" means content that an account holder makes available on a social media
platform for other account holders to consume.
5. Social media company. "Social media company" means a person that is an
interactive computer service and that provides a social media platform.
6. Social media platform. "Social media platform" means a website or Internet
application that:
A. Allows a person to create an account; and
B. Enables an account holder to communicate with other account holders through
posts.
§1500-AA. Use of social media platform; age requirements
1. Age verification. A social media company must verify the age of an individual who
attempts to become an account holder.
2. Individuals under 14 years of age. A social media company may not allow an
individual who is a minor under 14 years of age to become an account holder or remain an
account holder.
3. Individuals who are 14 or 15 years of age. If an individual is a minor who is 14
or 15 years of age, the social media company must verify that express parental consent has
been provided pursuant to section 1500-BB for the minor to become an account holder or
remain an account holder.
§1500-BB. Parental consent; requirements
1. Verification of parental consent. To verify parental consent for an individual who
is 14 or 15 years of age to become or remain an account holder, a social media company
must require the individual's parent to provide:
A. A government-issued identification document; and
Page 1 - 132LR0945(01)

B. Documentation verifying parental authorization.
2. Retention and revocation of parental consent. Upon receipt of parental consent
in accordance with subsection 1, a social media company shall retain those records for no
less than 2 years. A social media company shall provide an easily accessible method for a
parent to revoke parental consent and to request the termination of the individual's account
for which the parent provided the consent.
§1500-CC. Applicability
This chapter does not prohibit access to educational platforms or services specifically
designed for minors, as long as such platforms are not primarily social media platforms.
§1500-DD. Parental right to report
A parent or guardian of a minor who believes that the minor has been permitted to
become an account holder of a social media company in violation of this chapter may file
a complaint against the social media company with the Office of the Attorney General.
§1500-EE. Enforcement; penalties
The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. A social media
company that violates a provision of this chapter is subject to the following civil penalties
recoverable by the Attorney General in a civil action.
1. No prior violations; penalty. A social media company that has no previous
violations of this chapter may be fined an amount not to exceed $10,000 per violation.
2. Prior violation; penalty. A social media company that is found to have a previous
violation of this chapter may be fined an amount not to exceed $25,000 per violation.
§1500-FF. Rulemaking
The Office of the Attorney General shall adopt rules to implement this chapter. Rules
must include, but are not limited to, procedures for verifying account holder age and
parental consent. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.